Florida, session 2026, SB670.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 381.00321, Florida 17 Statutes, is amended to read: 18 381.00321âThe right of medical conscience of health care 19 providers and health care payors.â 20 (4)âENFORCEMENT.âA health care provider or health care 21 payor may file a complaint with the Attorney General alleging 22 any violation of this section. 23 (a)âIf the Attorney General determines there has been a 24 violation of this section, the Attorney General may commence a 25 civil action for damages, injunctive relief, or any other 26 appropriate relief, including attorney fees. For the purpose of 27 conducting an investigation, the Attorney General may administer 28 oaths; take depositions; make inspections when authorized by 29 law; issue subpoenas supported by affidavit; serve subpoenas and 30 other process; and compel the attendance of witnesses and the 31 production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence. The 32 Department of Legal Affairs may adopt rules to implement this 33 subsection. 34 (b)âIf the Attorney General does not commence a civil 35 action within 180 days after the filing of the complaint, a 36 health care provider or health care payor may commence a civil 37 action for damages, injunctive relief, or any other appropriate 38 relief, including attorney fees, or assert a violation of this 39 section as a defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding. 40 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.